Utah statutes.
48-3a-206.   Effective time and date.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 48-3a-207 and subject to Subsection 48-3a-208(3), a record filed under this chapter is effective:

(1)  on the date and at the time of its filing by the division, as provided in Section 48-3a-209;

(2)  on the date of filing and at the time specified in the record as its effective time, if later than the time under Subsection (1);

(3)  at a specified delayed effective date and time, which may not be more than 90 days after the date of filing; or

(4)  if a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, at 12:01 a.m. on the date specified, which may not be more than 90 days after the date of filing.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

